Illinois, session 104th, SB2827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act is 5amended by changing Sections 3 and 7.3 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2053)7    Sec. 3. As used in this Act unless the context otherwise 8requires: 9    "Adult resident" means any person between 18 and 22 years 10of age who resides in any facility licensed by the Department 11under the Child Care Act of 1969. For purposes of this Act, the 12criteria set forth in the definitions of "abused child" and 13"neglected child" shall be used in determining whether an 14adult resident is abused or neglected.15    "Agency" means a child care facility licensed under 16Section 2.05 or Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969 and 17includes a transitional living program that accepts children 18and adult residents for placement who are in the guardianship 19of the Department. 20    "Blatant disregard" means an incident where the real, 21significant, and imminent risk of harm would be so obvious to a 22reasonable parent or caretaker that it is unlikely that a 23reasonable parent or caretaker would have exposed the child to   SB2827- 2 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1the danger without exercising precautionary measures to 2protect the child from harm. With respect to a person working 3at an agency in the person's professional capacity with a 4child or adult resident, "blatant disregard" includes a 5failure by the person to perform job responsibilities intended 6to protect the child's or adult resident's health, physical 7well-being, or welfare, and, when viewed in light of the 8surrounding circumstances, evidence exists that would cause a 9reasonable person to believe that the child was neglected. 10With respect to an agency, "blatant disregard" includes a 11failure to implement practices that ensure the health, 12physical well-being, or welfare of the children and adult 13residents residing in the facility. 14    "Child" means any person under the age of 18 years, unless 15legally emancipated by reason of marriage or entry into a 16branch of the United States armed services.17    "Department" means Department of Children and Family 18Services.19    "Local law enforcement agency" means the police of a city, 20town, village or other incorporated area or the sheriff of an 21unincorporated area or any sworn officer of the Illinois State 22Police.23    "Abused child" means a child with respect to whom: whose24        (1) a parent, or25        (2) a parent's paramour, or 26        (3) any other person 14 years of age or older who is   SB2827- 3 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1    either responsible for the child's welfare, is an 2    immediate family member, or resides in the same home as 3    the child: any person responsible for the child's welfare, 4    or any individual residing in the same home as the child, 5    or a paramour of the child's parent:6        (a) inflicts, causes to be inflicted, or allows to be 7    inflicted upon such child physical injury, by other than 8    accidental means, which causes death, disfigurement, 9    impairment of physical or emotional health, or loss or 10    impairment of any bodily function;11        (b) creates a substantial risk of physical injury to 12    such child by other than accidental means which would be 13    likely to cause death, disfigurement, impairment of 14    physical or emotional health, or loss or impairment of any 15    bodily function;16        (c) commits or allows to be committed any sex offense 17    against such child, as such sex offenses are defined in 18    the Criminal Code of 2012 or in the Wrongs to Children Act, 19    and extending those definitions of sex offenses to include 20    children under 18 years of age;21        (d) commits or allows to be committed an act or acts of 22    torture upon such child;23        (e) inflicts excessive corporal punishment or, in the 24    case of a person working for an agency who is prohibited 25    from using corporal punishment, inflicts corporal 26    punishment upon a child or adult resident with whom the   SB2827- 4 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1    person is working in the person's professional capacity; 2        (f) commits or allows to be committed the offense of 3    female genital mutilation, as defined in Section 12-34 of 4    the Criminal Code of 2012, against the child;5        (g) causes to be sold, transferred, distributed, or 6    given to such child under 18 years of age, a controlled 7    substance as defined in Section 102 of the Illinois 8    Controlled Substances Act in violation of Article IV of 9    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act or in violation of 10    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 11    except for controlled substances that are prescribed in 12    accordance with Article III of the Illinois Controlled 13    Substances Act and are dispensed to such child in a manner 14    that substantially complies with the prescription; 15        (h) commits or allows to be committed the offense of 16    involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 17    minor, or trafficking in persons as defined in Section 18    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 against the child; or 19        (i) commits the offense of grooming, as defined in 20    Section 11-25 of the Criminal Code of 2012, against the 21    child.22    A child shall not be considered abused for the sole reason 23that the child has been relinquished in accordance with the 24Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.25    "Neglected child" means any child who is not receiving the 26proper or necessary nourishment or medically indicated   SB2827- 5 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1treatment including food or care not provided solely on the 2basis of the present or anticipated mental or physical 3impairment as determined by a physician acting alone or in 4consultation with other physicians or otherwise is not 5receiving the proper or necessary support or medical or other 6remedial care recognized under State law as necessary for a 7child's well-being, or other care necessary for the child's 8well-being, including adequate food, clothing and shelter; or 9who is subjected to an environment which is injurious insofar 10as (i) the child's environment creates a likelihood of harm to 11the child's health, physical well-being, or welfare and (ii) 12the likely harm to the child is the result of a blatant 13disregard of parent, caretaker, person responsible for the 14child's welfare, or agency responsibilities; or who is 15abandoned by the child's parents or other person responsible 16for the child's welfare without a proper plan of care; or who 17has been provided with interim crisis intervention services 18under Section 3-5 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and whose 19parent, guardian, or custodian refuses to permit the child to 20return home and no other living arrangement agreeable to the 21parent, guardian, or custodian can be made, and the parent, 22guardian, or custodian has not made any other appropriate 23living arrangement for the child; or who is a newborn infant 24whose blood, urine, or meconium contains any amount of a 25controlled substance as defined in subsection (f) of Section 26102 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act or a metabolite   SB2827- 6 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1thereof, with the exception of a controlled substance or 2metabolite thereof whose presence in the newborn infant is the 3result of medical treatment administered to the person who 4gave birth or the newborn infant. A child shall not be 5considered neglected for the sole reason that the child's 6parent or other person responsible for the child's welfare has 7left the child in the care of an adult relative for any period 8of time. A child shall not be considered neglected for the sole 9reason that the child has been relinquished in accordance with 10the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act. A child shall not 11be considered neglected or abused for the sole reason that 12such child's parent or other person responsible for the 13child's welfare depends upon spiritual means through prayer 14alone for the treatment or cure of disease or remedial care as 15provided under Section 4 of this Act. A child shall not be 16considered neglected or abused solely because the child is not 17attending school in accordance with the requirements of 18Article 26 of The School Code, as amended.19    "Child Protective Service Unit" means certain specialized 20State employees of the Department assigned by the Director to 21perform the duties and responsibilities as provided under 22Section 7.2 of this Act.23    "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a 24physician, places the child in serious or critical condition, 25including acts of great bodily harm inflicted upon children 26under 13 years of age, and as otherwise defined by Department   SB2827- 7 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1rule.2    "Great bodily harm" includes bodily injury which creates a 3high probability of death, or which causes serious permanent 4disfigurement, or which causes a permanent or protracted loss 5or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or 6other serious bodily harm.7    "Person responsible for the child's welfare" means the 8child's parent; guardian; foster parent; relative caregiver; 9any person responsible for the child's welfare in a public or 10private residential agency or institution; any person 11responsible for the child's welfare within a public or private 12profit or not for profit child care facility; or any other 13person responsible for the child's welfare at the time of the 14alleged abuse or neglect, including any person who commits or 15allows to be committed, against the child, the offense of 16involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 17minor, or trafficking in persons for forced labor or services, 18as provided in Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 19including, but not limited to, the custodian of the minor, or 20any person who came to know the child through an official 21capacity or position of trust, including, but not limited to, 22health care professionals, educational personnel, recreational 23supervisors, members of the clergy, and volunteers or support 24personnel in any setting where children may be subject to 25abuse or neglect.26    "Temporary protective custody" means custody within a   SB2827- 8 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1hospital or other medical facility or a place previously 2designated for such custody by the Department, subject to 3review by the Court, including a licensed foster home, group 4home, or other institution; but such place shall not be a jail 5or other place for the detention of criminal or juvenile 6offenders.7    "An unfounded report" means any report made under this Act 8for which it is determined after an investigation that no 9credible evidence of abuse or neglect exists.10    "An indicated report" means a report made under this Act 11if an investigation determines that credible evidence of the 12alleged abuse or neglect exists.13    "An undetermined report" means any report made under this 14Act in which it was not possible to initiate or complete an 15investigation on the basis of information provided to the 16Department.17    "Subject of report" means any child reported to the 18central register of child abuse and neglect established under 19Section 7.7 of this Act as an alleged victim of child abuse or 20neglect and the parent or guardian of the alleged victim or 21other person responsible for the alleged victim's welfare who 22is named in the report or added to the report as an alleged 23perpetrator of child abuse or neglect.24    "Perpetrator" means a person who, as a result of 25investigation, has been determined by the Department to have 26caused child abuse or neglect.  SB2827- 9 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1    "Member of the clergy" means a clergyperson or 2practitioner of any religious denomination accredited by the 3religious body to which the clergyperson or practitioner 4belongs.5(Source: P.A. 102-567, eff. 1-1-22; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 6102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 7    (325 ILCS 5/7.3)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2057.3)8    Sec. 7.3. (a) The Department shall be the sole agency 9responsible for receiving and investigating reports of child 10abuse or neglect made under this Act, including reports of 11adult resident abuse or neglect as defined in this Act, except 12where investigations by other agencies may be required with 13respect to reports alleging the abuse or neglect of a child by 14a person who is not the child's parent, a member of the child's 15immediate family, a person responsible for the child's 16welfare, an individual residing in the same home as the child, 17or a paramour of the child's parent, the death of a child, 18serious injury to a child or sexual abuse to a child made 19pursuant to Sections 4.1 or 7 of this Act, and except that the 20Department may delegate the performance of the investigation 21to the Illinois State Police, a law enforcement agency and to 22those private social service agencies which have been 23designated for this purpose by the Department prior to July 1, 241980.25    (a-5) If the Department does not accept a report for   SB2827- 10 -LRB104 16827 KTG 30236 b1investigation on the sole basis that the alleged perpetrator 2is another person in the household under the age of 14, then 3the Department shall consider if there is reasonable cause to 4suspect that the alleged maltreatment is the result of blatant 5disregard on the part of an adult or agency who is an eligible 6perpetrator. If so, the Department shall accept a report 7alleging abuse or neglect identifying the adult or agency as 8the alleged perpetrator. The Department may also consider 9whether a child welfare service referral would be appropriate. 10    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 11Department shall adopt rules expressly allowing law 12enforcement personnel to investigate reports of suspected 13child abuse or neglect concurrently with the Department, 14without regard to whether the Department determines a report 15to be "indicated" or "unfounded" or deems a report to be 16"undetermined". 17    (c) By June 1, 2016, the Department shall adopt rules that 18address and set forth criteria and standards relevant to 19investigations of reports of abuse or neglect committed by any 20agency, as defined in Section 3 of this Act, or person working 21for an agency responsible for the welfare of a child or adult 22resident. 23(Source: P.A. 101-583, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)